Washington statutes.
RCW 19.122.075

Damage or removal of permanent marking—Civil penalty.

Any person who willfully damages or removes a permanent marking used to identify an underground facility or pipeline, or a temporary marking prior to its intended use, is subject to a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars for an initial violation, and not more than five thousand dollars for each subsequent violation within a three-year period.

[ 2011 c 263 s 14; 2000 c 191 s 23.]

NOTES:

Report—Effective date—2011 c 263: See notes following RCW 19.122.010.

Intent—Findings—Conflict with federal requirements—Short title—Effective date—2000 c 191: See RCW 81.88.005 and 81.88.900 through 81.88.902.